Vermont, session 2025-2026, H873.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 5131 is amended to read:
§ 5131. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Course of conduct” means:
(i) two or more acts over a period of time, however short, in which
a person follows, monitors, surveils, threatens, or makes threats about another
person, or interferes with another person’s property; or
VT LEG #386650 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.873
2026 Page 2 of 4
(ii) use of any electronic, digital, or precise geolocation device or
software or application to surveil a specific person or a specific person’s
internet or wireless activity continuously for 12 hours or more or on two or
more occasions over a period of time, however short, without authorization.
(B) This definition shall apply to acts conducted by the person
directly or indirectly, and by any action, method, device, or means.
Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of
“course of conduct.”
(C) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1),:
(i) threaten shall not be construed to require an express or overt
threat; and
(ii) course of conduct shall not be construed to require that the two
or more acts occur on separate calendar days.
* * *
(6) “Stalk” means to engage purposefully in a course of conduct directed
at a specific person that the person engaging in the conduct knows or should
know would cause a reasonable person to:
(A) fear for the person’s safety or the safety of a family member; or
(B) suffer substantial emotional distress as evidenced by:
(i) a fear of unlawful sexual conduct, unlawful restraint, bodily
injury, or death; or
VT LEG #386650 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.873
2026 Page 3 of 4
(ii) significant modifications in the person’s actions or routines,
including moving from an established residence, changes to established daily
routes to and from work that cause a serious disruption in the person’s life,
changes to the person’s employment or work schedule, or the loss of a job or
time from work.
* * *
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 1061 is amended to read:
§ 1061. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Course of conduct” means two or more acts over a period of
time, however short, in which a person follows, monitors, surveils, threatens,
or makes threats about another person, or interferes with another person’s
property. This definition shall apply to acts conducted by the person directly
or indirectly, and by any action, method, device, or means. Constitutionally
protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”
(B) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1),:
(i) threaten shall not be construed to require an express or overt
threat; and
(ii) course of conduct shall not be construed to require that the two or
more acts occur on separate calendar days.
VT LEG #386650 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.873
2026 Page 4 of 4
(2) “Emotional distress” means significant mental suffering or distress
that may, but does not necessarily, require medical or other professional
treatment or counseling.
(3) “Reasonable person” means a reasonable person in the victim’s
circumstances.
(4) “Stalk” means to engage purposefully in a course of conduct directed
at a specific person that the person engaging in the conduct knows or should
know would cause a reasonable person to fear for his or her safety or the safety
of another or would cause a reasonable person substantial emotional distress.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386650 v.1